algorithms/ukrainian.sbl
        // their singular
        '{o}{s}{v}{i}{t}{y}'                (<- '{o}{s}{v}{i}{t}')          // освіти
        '{r}{e}{z}{u}{l}{'}{t}{a}{t}{y}'    (<- '{r}{e}{z}{u}{l}{'}{t}{a}{t}') // результати
        '{v}{t}{r}{a}{t}{y}'                (<- '{v}{t}{r}{a}{t}')          // втрати
        '{p}{a}{l}{a}{t}{y}'                (<- '{p}{a}{l}{a}{t}')          // палати
        '{h}{a}{r}{m}{a}{t}{y}'             (<- '{h}{a}{r}{m}{a}{t}')       // гармати
        '{d}{e}{p}{u}{t}{a}{t}{y}'          (<- '{d}{e}{p}{u}{t}{a}{t}')    // депутати
        '{v}{y}{t}{r}{a}{t}{y}'             (<- '{v}{y}{t}{r}{a}{t}')       // витрати
        '{s}{o}{l}{d}{a}{t}{y}'             (<- '{s}{o}{l}{d}{a}{t}')       // солдати
        '{sh}{t}{a}{t}{y}'                  (<- '{sh}{t}{a}{t}')            // штати
        '{o}{r}{b}{i}{t}{y}'                (<- '{o}{r}{b}{i}{t}')          // орбіти
        '{k}{i}{m}{n}{a}{t}{y}'             (<- '{k}{i}{m}{n}{a}{t}')       // кімнати
        '{p}{r}{o}{s}{v}{i}{t}{y}'          (<- '{p}{r}{o}{s}{v}{i}{t}')    // просвіти
        '{s}{t}{r}{a}{t}{y}'                (<- '{s}{t}{r}{a}{t}')          // страти
        '{k}{o}{o}{r}{d}{y}{n}{a}{t}{y}'    (<- '{k}{o}{o}{r}{d}{y}{n}{a}{t}') // координати
        '{l}{a}{u}{r}{e}{a}{t}{y}'          (<- '{l}{a}{u}{r}{e}{a}{t}')    // лауреати
        '{k}{a}{n}{d}{y}{d}{a}{t}{y}'       (<- '{k}{a}{n}{d}{y}{d}{a}{t}') // кандидати
        '{ch}{e}{m}{p}{i}{o}{n}{a}{t}{y}'   (<- '{ch}{e}{m}{p}{i}{o}{n}{a}{t}') // чемпіонати
        '{p}{l}{y}{t}{y}'                   (<- '{p}{l}{y}{t}')             // плити
        '{a}{p}{a}{r}{a}{t}{y}'             (<- '{a}{p}{a}{r}{a}{t}')       // апарати
        '{p}{r}{e}{p}{a}{r}{a}{t}{y}'       (<- '{p}{r}{e}{p}{a}{r}{a}{t}') // препарати
        '{e}{l}{i}{t}{y}'                   (<- '{e}{l}{i}{t}')             // еліти
        '{z}{v}{i}{t}{y}'                   (<- '{z}{v}{i}{t}')             // звіти
        '{o}{p}{l}{a}{t}{y}'                (<- '{o}{p}{l}{a}{t}')          // оплати
        '{s}{v}{i}{t}{y}'                   (<- '{s}{v}{i}{t}')             // світи
        '{s}{p}{l}{a}{t}{y}'                (<- '{s}{p}{l}{a}{t}')          // сплати
        '{v}{y}{p}{l}{a}{t}{y}'             (<- '{v}{y}{p}{l}{a}{t}')       // виплати
        '{e}{k}{s}{p}{o}{n}{a}{t}{y}'       (<- '{e}{k}{s}{p}{o}{n}{a}{t}') // експонати
        '{i}{s}{p}{y}{t}{y}'                (<- '{i}{s}{p}{y}{t}')          // іспити
        '{ts}{y}{t}{a}{t}{y}'               (<- '{ts}{y}{t}{a}{t}')         // цитати
        '{m}{a}{r}{h}{a}{r}{y}{t}{y}'       (<- '{m}{a}{r}{h}{a}{r}{y}{t}') // Маргарити
        '{h}{r}{a}{n}{a}{t}{y}'             (<- '{h}{r}{a}{n}{a}{t}')       // гранати
        '{p}{o}{v}{i}{t}{y}'                (<- '{p}{o}{v}{i}{t}')          // повіти
        '{z}{a}{p}{y}{t}{y}'                (<- '{z}{a}{p}{y}{t}')          // запити
        '{d}{e}{m}{o}{k}{r}{a}{t}{y}'       (<- '{d}{e}{m}{o}{k}{r}{a}{t}') // демократи
        '{f}{o}{r}{m}{a}{t}{y}'             (<- '{f}{o}{r}{m}{a}{t}')       // формати
        '{a}{h}{r}{e}{h}{a}{t}{y}'          (<- '{a}{h}{r}{e}{h}{a}{t}')    // агрегати
        // Genitive plurals in -ей whose stem differs from the other forms:
        // статей (стаття → статт) would meet стать; сімей (сім'я → сім')
        // would meet the numeral сім
        '{s}{t}{a}{t}{e}{i`}'               (<- '{s}{t}{a}{t}{t}')         // статей
        '{s}{i}{m}{e}{i`}'                  (<- '{s}{i}{m}{ap}')           // сімей
        // Names and nouns in -ей after т, м, н, л, or too short for the
        // letter to be tested, where -ей is otherwise the genitive plural
        // ending: the е stays, as in their other forms (музею → музе)
        '{m}{u}{z}{e}{i`}'                  (<- '{m}{u}{z}{e}')            // музей
        '{l}{i}{ts}{e}{i`}'                 (<- '{l}{i}{ts}{e}')           // ліцей
        '{kh}{o}{k}{e}{i`}'                 (<- '{kh}{o}{k}{e}')           // хокей
        '{ie}{v}{r}{e}{i`}'                 (<- '{ie}{v}{r}{e}')           // єврей
        '{i}{ie}{r}{e}{i`}'                 (<- '{i}{ie}{r}{e}')           // ієрей
        '{o}{r}{f}{e}{i`}'                  (<- '{o}{r}{f}{e}')            // Орфей
        '{t}{a}{d}{e}{i`}'                  (<- '{t}{a}{d}{e}')            // Тадей
        '{m}{a}{ts}{e}{i`}'                 (<- '{m}{a}{ts}{e}')           // Мацей
        '{p}{r}{o}{m}{e}{t}{e}{i`}'         (<- '{p}{r}{o}{m}{e}{t}{e}')   // Прометей
        '{m}{a}{t}{e}{i`}'                  (<- '{m}{a}{t}{e}')            // Матей
        '{p}{t}{o}{l}{e}{m}{e}{i`}'         (<- '{p}{t}{o}{l}{e}{m}{e}')   // Птолемей
        '{s}{i}{d}{n}{e}{i`}'               (<- '{s}{i}{d}{n}{e}')         // Сідней
        '{d}{i}{s}{n}{e}{i`}'               (<- '{d}{i}{s}{n}{e}')         // Дісней
        '{b}{r}{u}{n}{e}{i`}'               (<- '{b}{r}{u}{n}{e}')         // Бруней
        '{e}{n}{e}{i`}'                     (<- '{e}{n}{e}')               // Еней
        '{i}{r}{y}{n}{e}{i`}'               (<- '{i}{r}{y}{n}{e}')         // Іриней
        '{iu}{v}{i}{l}{e}{i`}'              (<- '{iu}{v}{i}{l}{e}')        // ювілей
        '{p}{r}{y}{v}{i}{l}{e}{i`}'         (<- '{p}{r}{y}{v}{i}{l}{e}')   // привілей
        '{k}{l}{e}{i`}'                     (<- '{k}{l}{e}')               // клей
        '{m}{a}{v}{z}{o}{l}{e}{i`}'         (<- '{m}{a}{v}{z}{o}{l}{e}')   // мавзолей
        '{d}{y}{s}{p}{l}{e}{i`}'            (<- '{d}{y}{s}{p}{l}{e}')      // дисплей
        '{h}{a}{l}{i}{l}{e}{i`}'            (<- '{h}{a}{l}{i}{l}{e}')      // Галілей
        // Numerals in -яти whose с/апостроф sits outside pV, so the -яти
        // guard cannot see it (десяти → десят as десять)
        '{d}{e}{s}{ia}{t}{y}'               (<- '{d}{e}{s}{ia}{t}')        // десяти
        '{d}{e}{s}{ia}{t}{'}'               (<- '{d}{e}{s}{ia}{t}')        // десять
        // Months and other -ень/-інь nouns with a fleeting or alternating
        // vowel: the nominative takes the stem of the oblique forms
        // (березень/березня → березн, рівень/рівня → рівн, камінь/каменя → камен)
        '{s}{i}{ch}{e}{n}{'}'               (<- '{s}{i}{ch}{n}')           // січень
        '{b}{e}{r}{e}{z}{e}{n}{'}'          (<- '{b}{e}{r}{e}{z}{n}')      // березень
        '{k}{v}{i}{t}{e}{n}{'}'             (<- '{k}{v}{i}{t}{n}')         // квітень
        '{t}{r}{a}{v}{e}{n}{'}'             (<- '{t}{r}{a}{v}{n}')         // травень
        '{ch}{e}{r}{v}{e}{n}{'}'            (<- '{ch}{e}{r}{v}{n}')        // червень
        '{l}{y}{p}{e}{n}{'}'                (<- '{l}{y}{p}{n}')            // липень
        '{s}{e}{r}{p}{e}{n}{'}'             (<- '{s}{e}{r}{p}{n}')         // серпень
        '{v}{e}{r}{e}{s}{e}{n}{'}'          (<- '{v}{e}{r}{e}{s}{n}')      // вересень
        '{zh}{o}{v}{t}{e}{n}{'}'            (<- '{zh}{o}{v}{t}{n}')        // жовтень
        '{h}{r}{u}{d}{e}{n}{'}'             (<- '{h}{r}{u}{d}{n}')         // грудень
        '{r}{i}{v}{e}{n}{'}'                (<- '{r}{i}{v}{n}')            // рівень
        '{u}{ch}{e}{n}{'}'                  (<- '{u}{ch}{n}')              // учень
        '{s}{t}{u}{p}{i}{n}{'}'             (<- '{s}{t}{u}{p}{e}{n}')      // ступінь
        '{p}{r}{o}{m}{i}{n}{'}'             (<- '{p}{r}{o}{m}{e}{n}')      // промінь
        '{k}{a}{m}{i}{n}{'}'                (<- '{k}{a}{m}{e}{n}')         // камінь
        '{k}{o}{r}{i}{n}{'}'                (<- '{k}{o}{r}{e}{n}')         // корінь
        '{p}{ap}{ia}{t}{y}'                 (<- '{p}{ap}{ia}{t}')          // п'яти
        '{d}{e}{v}{ap}{ia}{t}{y}'           (<- '{d}{e}{v}{ap}{ia}{t}')    // дев'яти
        // пророк keeps its о (not fleeting: пророка), unlike будинок/будинку
        '{p}{r}{o}{r}{o}{k}'                (<- '{p}{r}{o}{r}{o}{k}')      // пророк
        '{p}{r}{o}{r}{o}{k}{a}'             (<- '{p}{r}{o}{r}{o}{k}')      // пророка
        '{p}{r}{o}{r}{o}{k}{u}'             (<- '{p}{r}{o}{r}{o}{k}')      // пророку
        '{p}{r}{o}{r}{o}{k}{o}{m}'          (<- '{p}{r}{o}{r}{o}{k}')      // пророком
        '{p}{r}{o}{r}{o}{k}{y}'             (<- '{p}{r}{o}{r}{o}{k}')      // пророки
        '{p}{r}{o}{r}{o}{k}{i}{v}'          (<- '{p}{r}{o}{r}{o}{k}')      // пророків
        // людина/люди and дитина/діти: singular and plural have different
        // roots; the singular takes the stem of the plural
        '{l}{iu}{d}{y}{n}{a}'               (<- '{l}{iu}{d}')              // людина
        '{l}{iu}{d}{y}{n}{y}'               (<- '{l}{iu}{d}')              // людини
        '{l}{iu}{d}{y}{n}{i}'               (<- '{l}{iu}{d}')              // людині
        '{l}{iu}{d}{y}{n}{u}'               (<- '{l}{iu}{d}')              // людину
        '{l}{iu}{d}{y}{n}{o}{iu}'           (<- '{l}{iu}{d}')              // людиною
        '{d}{y}{t}{y}{n}{a}'                (<- '{d}{i}{t}')               // дитина
        '{d}{y}{t}{y}{n}{y}'                (<- '{d}{i}{t}')               // дитини
        '{d}{y}{t}{y}{n}{i}'                (<- '{d}{i}{t}')               // дитині
        '{d}{y}{t}{y}{n}{u}'                (<- '{d}{i}{t}')               // дитину
        '{d}{y}{t}{y}{n}{o}{iu}'            (<- '{d}{i}{t}')               // дитиною
        // день: every form is too short for pV, so the whole paradigm is listed
        '{d}{e}{n}{'}'                      (<- '{d}{n}')                  // день
        '{d}{n}{ia}'                        (<- '{d}{n}')                  // дня
        '{d}{n}{iu}'                        (<- '{d}{n}')                  // дню
        '{d}{n}{e}{m}'                      (<- '{d}{n}')                  // днем
        '{d}{n}{i}'                         (<- '{d}{n}')                  // дні
        '{d}{n}{i}{v}'                      (<- '{d}{n}')                  // днів
        '{d}{n}{ia}{m}'                     (<- '{d}{n}')                  // дням
        '{d}{n}{ia}{m}{y}'                  (<- '{d}{n}')                  // днями
        '{d}{n}{ia}{kh}'                    (<- '{d}{n}')                  // днях
        // genitive plurals with a fleeting е (земля → земель, будівля → будівель)
        '{z}{e}{m}{e}{l}{'}'                (<- '{z}{e}{m}{l}')            // земель
        '{b}{u}{d}{i}{v}{e}{l}{'}'          (<- '{b}{u}{d}{i}{v}')         // будівель
        // голова → голів (gen pl) would meet гол (goal)
        '{h}{o}{l}{i}{v}'                   (<- '{h}{o}{l}{o}{v}')         // голів
        // євангеліє is the same noun as євангелія
        '{ie}{v}{a}{n}{h}{e}{l}{i}{ie}'     (<- '{ie}{v}{a}{n}{h}{e}{l}')  // євангеліє
        // осінь/осені: і/е alternation
        '{o}{s}{i}{n}{'}'                   (<- '{o}{s}{e}{n}')            // осінь
        // Cities whose nominative -ів alternates with -ов/-ев/-ол
        '{l}{'}{v}{i}{v}'                   (<- '{l}{'}{v}{o}{v}')         // Львів
        '{kh}{a}{r}{k}{i}{v}'               (<- '{kh}{a}{r}{k}{o}{v}')     // Харків
        '{ch}{e}{r}{n}{i}{h}{i}{v}'         (<- '{ch}{e}{r}{n}{i}{h}')      // Чернігів (Чернігова → черніг via -ов)
        '{m}{y}{k}{o}{l}{a}{yi}{v}'         (<- '{m}{y}{k}{o}{l}{a}{ie}{v}') // Миколаїв
        '{t}{e}{r}{n}{o}{p}{i}{l}{'}'       (<- '{t}{e}{r}{n}{o}{p}{o}{l}') // Тернопіль
        '{b}{o}{r}{y}{s}{p}{i}{l}{'}'       (<- '{b}{o}{r}{y}{s}{p}{o}{l}') // Бориспіль
        // Place names in -ань are not the genitive plural of a -ння noun
        '{b}{e}{r}{e}{z}{a}{n}{'}'          (<- '{b}{e}{r}{e}{z}{a}{n}')   // Березань
        '{a}{s}{t}{r}{a}{kh}{a}{n}{'}'      (<- '{a}{s}{t}{r}{a}{kh}{a}{n}') // Астрахань
        '{b}{o}{t}{o}{sh}{a}{n}{'}'         (<- '{b}{o}{t}{o}{sh}{a}{n}')  // Ботошань
        // останній: its feminine and plural forms look like a -ння noun
        '{o}{s}{t}{a}{n}{n}{ia}'            (<- '{o}{s}{t}{a}{n}')         // остання
        '{o}{s}{t}{a}{n}{n}{iu}'            (<- '{o}{s}{t}{a}{n}')         // останню
